tables/fa-ir-shortwriting-1393.ctb
# liblouis: Persian shortwriting from the 1393 Iranian manual
#
# This is a documentary implementation of chapter 5, "Persian Braille
# shortwriting", in the 1393/2014 edition of مجموعه علائم بریل, published by
# Iran's National Organization for Special Education.
#
# Source locations:
# - shortwriting chapter: printed pages 68-89 (PDF pages 69-90)
# - repeated, legible Table 2-15: printed pages 367-369 (PDF pages 368-370)
# - source SHA-256:
#   7974b08c12ece7242b2a435e71c5c8cacc2f296bad8728544a310cb33c9ada63
#
# The source is historical. Its current normative status and acceptance by
# proficient Persian Braille readers have not been verified. "Grade 2" below
# is an operational Liblouis classification; the source calls the system
# Persian shortwriting.
#
# The source has two editorial problems retained here:
# - Table 2-13 assigns بخش to 46-12 although its note says ب is unused.
# - Table 2-15 prints رور for 456-135 in both occurrences. This is probably a
#   typo for روز, but the documentary rule below preserves the printed form;
#   روز retains its unambiguous 5-1235 assignment from Table 2-11.
#
# The source does not say which contraction to expand when two short-height
# cells would otherwise form a forbidden isolated pair. This table expands
# the leftmost contraction in such a pair. That is a conservative,
# deterministic Liblouis implementation policy, following the technical
# precedent in es-g2.ctb; it is not a priority rule stated by the Persian
# source. The source also does not fully specify Unicode spelling or the
# Braille ordering for every shadda exception. This forward-only table
# therefore contracts only exact unvocalized matches (plus the explicitly
# listed source spelling اتّفاق); a shadda inside another candidate safely
# prevents that contraction.
#
# Copyright (C) 2026 Reza Sayar <rsayar@uvic.ca>
#
# This file is free software; you can redistribute it and/or
# modify it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public
# License as published by the Free Software Foundation; either
# version 2.1 of the License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
# This file is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
# Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
# License along with this file. If not, see
# <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

#-index-name: Persian, shortwriting (1393)
#-display-name: Persian shortwriting braille (1393 historical manual)
#+language: fa
#+region: fa-IR
#+type: literary
#+contraction: full
#+grade: 2
#+variant: 1393-shortwriting
#+version: 1393
#+direction: forward
#-author: Reza Sayar <rsayar@uvic.ca>

include fa-ir-g1.utb

# The master Grade 1 table does not yet define dagger alif, which the manual
# gives dots 5 before applying the shortwriting conversion sign.
sign \x0670 5

# The included Grade 1 table already defines ASCII quotation marks and
# semicolons. Since the first legal same-string rule wins in Liblouis, later
# rules cannot add the shortwriting conversion sign to those characters.
# Normalize them to private placeholders whose unshadowed definitions include
# dots 56 while preserving the Grade 1 opening/closing quote cells.
punctuation \xE000 56-58
prepunc \xE000 56-57
postpunc \xE000 56-58
punctuation \xE001 56-23

# Virtual-dot markers for the short-height Table 2-15 fragments. They retain
# which print fragment produced a lower-cell contraction until the multipass
# rules at the end of the table either expand it or remove the marker.
sign \xE100 26a
sign \xE101 35b
sign \xE102 35c
sign \xE103 235d
sign \xE104 23e
sign \xE105 2356f
sign \xE106 2569a
sign \xE107 3569b
sign \xE108 2369c
sign \xE109 369d
sign \xE10A 259e
sign \xE10B 39f
sign \xE10C 269ab

# The current Grade 1 table defines these characters as signs. Word and
# part-word opcodes need the Persian alphabet to carry the letter attribute.
attribute letter ءآأؤإئابتثجچحخدذرزژسشصضطظعغفقكکگلمنوهىيی
# The Grade 1 table labels the Persian comma, semicolon, and question mark as
# generic signs. Shortwriting boundary/context rules need their punctuation
# role as well.
attribute punctuation ،؛؟

# Normalize common Unicode spellings before contraction matching.
noback correct "ك" "ک"
noback correct "ي" "ی"
noback correct "\"" "\xE000"
noback correct ";" "\xE001"
noback correct $l["ه\x200Cی"] "هی"
# A spaced ezafe ی must be a standalone token. Without the right-boundary
# check, text such as خانه یوسف loses a genuine word boundary.
noback correct $l["ه\sی"]!$l "هی"
noback correct $l["ه\sی"]~ "هی"
noback correct $l["ه\x0654"] "هی"
noback correct $l["ۀ"] "هی"
noback correct "\x200C" ?

# The manual's conversion sign is dots 56. A literal Persian letter standing
# alone receives it when that cell is also used as a word sign, except where
# plain text cannot distinguish that letter from an identical source word.
nocontractsign 56

# Punctuation may attach to a word sign in the source. Treat it as part of a
# standing-alone sequence so literal one-letter words still receive dots 56.
seqdelimiter -‐‑–
seqbeforechars ([{"«“‘\xE000
seqafterchars )]}"»”’.,،;؛:!?؟…\xE000\xE001

contraction آ
contraction ا
contraction ب
contraction پ
contraction ت
contraction ث
contraction ج
contraction چ
contraction ح
contraction خ
contraction د
contraction ذ
contraction ر
contraction ز
contraction ژ
contraction س
contraction ش
contraction ص
contraction ض
contraction ط
contraction ظ
contraction ع
contraction غ
contraction ف
contraction ق
contraction ک
contraction گ
contraction ل
contraction م
contraction ن
contraction ه
contraction ی

# The print token و is both the letter name and the ordinary conjunction in
# Table 2-7. Plain text carries no semantic distinction, so the normal
# conjunction/word-sign reading wins; a transcriber must supply dots 56 when
# explicitly discussing the letter itself.

# Other literal signs named by the conversion-sign paragraph. These direct
# rules preserve the Grade 1 cell after a leading dots-56 cell. Longer word
# and fragment rules still take precedence, so forms such as مؤثر and تألیف
# contract as specified by their source tables.
always ٌ 56-26
always ٍ 56-35
always ى 56-135
always ة 56-16
always ٰ 56-5
always أ 56-34
always إ 56-34
always ؤ 56-1256
always ئ 56-13456
always ژ 56-346
word ء 56-3
endword ء 56-3
always ُ 56-136
always ِ 56-15
always ْ 56-25

always { 56-5-236
always } 56-356-2
always [ 56-6-236
always ] 56-356-3
always ( 56-2356
always ) 56-2356
always « 56-236
always » 56-356
always ؛ 56-23
always “ 56-6-12356
always ” 56-23456-3
always ‘ 56-236
always ’ 56-356

# Unambiguous mathematical characters receive the same conversion prefix.
# A hyphen/minus and an opening parenthetical dash depend on document
# semantics that plain Unicode text does not expose, so their existing Grade
# 1 behavior is retained.
always + 56-56-235
always = 56-56-2356
always < 56-246
always > 56-135
always / 56-34
always × 56-56-236
always ÷ 56-56-256
always − 56-56-36
always % 56-25-1234

# Table 2-7, bare whole-word signs (printed pages 72-73).
word تا 345
word او 1
word به 12
word پس 1234
word تو 2345
word مثل 1456
word جمله 245
word چه 14
word حرف 156
word خود 1346
word دارد 145
word ذکر 2346
word راه 1235
word از 1356
word سر 234
word شد 146
word صورت 12346
word بعضی 1246
word طرف 23456
word نظر 123456
word عالم 12356
word غیر 126
word فقط 124
word قرآن 12345
word که 13
word اگر 1245
word لازم 123
word من 134
word نیز 1345
word و 2456
word همه 125
word یا 24

# Table 2-8, letter cell followed by dot 3 (printed pages 74-75).
word آیا 345-3
word بدون 12-3
word سپس 1234-3
word تألیف 2345-3
word ثابت 1456-3
word جملهی 245-3
word چیست 14-3
word حضرت 156-3
word خدا 1346-3
word دربارهی 145-3
word حذف 2346-3
word روش 1235-3
word زیر 1356-3
# The source literally abbreviates the following two religious phrases with
# ellipses. These rules preserve the printed strings without guessing the
# omitted text.
word سلام\sا...علیها 234-3
word شما 146-3
word صلی\sالله... 12346-3
word ماضی 1246-3
word مطلق 23456-3
word عظیم 123456-3
word علیه\sالسلام 12356-3
word اغلب 126-3
word فارسی 124-3
word قرن 12345-3
word کسی 13-3
word گرچه 1245-3
word لحاظ 123-3
word معنی 134-3
word نسبت 1345-3
word ولی 2456-3
word همهی 125-3
word یکدیگر 24-3

# Table 2-9, letter cell followed by dots 23 (printed pages 76-77).
word آثار 345-23
word اندازه 1-23
word بنابراین 12-23
word پاسخ 1234-23
word ترتیب 2345-23
word مثلاً 1456-23
word مثلا 1456-23
word جهت 245-23
word چگونه 14-23
word حتی 156-23
word خداوند 1346-23
word داده 145-23
word مذکور 2346-23
word رعایت 1235-23
word زیرا 1356-23
word ساده 234-23
word شعر 146-23
word خلاصه 12346-23
word مضارع 1246-23
word مربوط 23456-23
word ظهور 123456-23
word عنوان 12356-23
word غالباً 126-23
word غالبا 126-23
word فرهنگ 124-23
word دقت 12345-23
word اکنون 13-23
word اگرچه 1245-23
word لحظه 123-23
word ممکن 134-23
word نثر 1345-23
word وقتی 2456-23
word همیشه 125-23
word یادآوری 24-23

# The source permits a following dot 3 as ezafe after every Table 2-9
# sign. Most Persian ezafe is not encoded in plain text, so forward
# translation cannot infer it safely. Only expansions ending in ه have
# explicit Unicode spellings that the normalization rules above reduce to
# an exact ...هی form; those observable forms are implemented here.
word اندازهی 1-23-3
word چگونهی 14-23-3
word دادهی 145-23-3
word سادهی 234-23-3
word خلاصهی 12346-23-3
word اگرچهی 1245-23-3
word لحظهی 123-23-3
word همیشهی 125-23-3

# Tables 2-10 through 2-14 say each listed word or fragment may be used
# alone, initially, medially, or finally as applicable. A word rule covers
# the standalone use and a partword rule covers every licensed in-word
# position without forcing the contraction in noContractions mode.

# Table 2-10, prefix dot 4 (printed pages 77-78).
word آزاد 4-345
partword آزاد 4-345
word پیدا 4-1234
partword پیدا 4-1234
word اتفاق 4-2345
partword اتفاق 4-2345
word اتّفاق 4-2345
partword اتّفاق 4-2345
word اثر 4-1456
partword اثر 4-1456
word اجتماع 4-245
partword اجتماع 4-245
word چنان 4-14
partword چنان 4-14
word احت 4-156
partword احت 4-156
word اخت 4-1346
partword اخت 4-1346
word دانش 4-145
partword دانش 4-145
word ذات 4-2346
partword ذات 4-2346
word رسا 4-1235
partword رسا 4-1235
word زبان 4-1356
partword زبان 4-1356
word سنگ 4-234
partword سنگ 4-234
word شاعر 4-146
partword شاعر 4-146
word اصل 4-12346
partword اصل 4-12346
word اضافه 4-1246
partword اضافه 4-1246
word خاطر 4-23456
partword خاطر 4-23456
word انتظار 4-123456
partword انتظار 4-123456
word اعت 4-12356
partword اعت 4-12356
word آغاز 4-126
partword آغاز 4-126
word فرمان 4-124
partword فرمان 4-124
word قرار 4-12345
partword قرار 4-12345
word کتاب 4-13
partword کتاب 4-13
word گاه 4-1245
partword گاه 4-1245
word مانند 4-134
partword مانند 4-134
word نامه 4-1345
partword نامه 4-1345
word واقع 4-2456
partword واقع 4-2456
word اهمیت 4-125
partword اهمیت 4-125
